dictionaries/gl_ES/src/gl_ES.dic
adviñer/666,741,743,744
advir/740,741,745
cómprir/666,753
concernir/750
concirnir/666,753,754
concírnir/666,753,755
conviñer/666,741,743,744
convir/740,741,745
desconviñer/666,741,743,744
desconvir/740,741,745
deviñer/666,741,743,744
devir/740,741,745
fondir/666,753
incúmbir/666,752
incumbir/750,751
interviñer/666,741,742,743,744
interviñer/666,741,743,744
intervir/740,741,745
proviñer/666,741,743,744
provir/740,741,745
reconviñer/666,641,643,644,741,743,744
reconvir/640,641,645,740,741,745
sobreviñer/666,741,743,744
sobrevir/740,741,745
tremelocir/666,753
tremelócir/666,753
tremelúcir/666,752
tremelucir/750,751
urxir/650,651,750,751
úrxir/666,652,752
viñer/666,641,642,643,644,740,741,742,743,744,841,842,842,843,844
